Massachusetts, session 194th, S1104.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 13B of chapter 265 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “prosecuted” the following
words:- unless the defendant is not more than 2 years older than the minor and the minor has
attained the age of 13 years.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 54 of chapter 119 or any other general or
special law to the contrary, in a prosecution under this section in which the defendant is under
the age of criminal majority at the time of the offense, the commonwealth shall only proceed by
complaint in juvenile court or in a juvenile session of a district court.
SECTION 2. Said chapter 265, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by striking out
section 23 and inserting in place thereof the following:-
of 2

Section 23. Whoever has sexual intercourse or unnatural sexual intercourse with a minor
under 16 years of age, unless the defendant is not more than 2 years older than the minor and the
minor has attained the age of 13 years, shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for
life or for any term of years or, except as otherwise provided, for any term in a jail or house of
correction. A prosecution commenced under this section shall not be placed on file or continued
without a finding.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 54 of chapter 119 or any other general or
special law to the contrary, in a prosecution under this section in which the defendant is under
the age of criminal majority at the time of the offense, the commonwealth shall only proceed by
complaint in juvenile court or in a juvenile session of a district court.
SECTION 3. Section 4 of chapter 272 of the General Laws is hereby repealed.
of 2